Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2616YC (1) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 710A.1, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 10. âServicesâ means an ongoing relationship between a 3 person and the actor in which the person performs performing 4 activities under the supervision of or for the benefit of the 5 an actor, including commercial sexual activity and sexually 6 explicit performances. 7